.github/vale/config/dictionaries/acronyms.aff
SET UTF-8                # Set character encoding to UTF-8
FLAG UTF-8               # Using UTF-8 flag

# Suffix rules for adding 's' to form plurals
SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0       s       .

# Suffix rules for adding "'s" to indicate possession
SFX M Y 1
SFX M   0       's      .
