.github/vale/config/dictionaries/acronyms.dic
82
ACL/S
AKM/S
APDU/S
API/S
ARL/S
ATL/S
BR/S
BSD
BSS/S
CA/SM
CCB/S
CNAME
CPU/S
CRL/S
CSR/SM
DAC/SM
DCL/M
DM/S
DN/S
DNS
DNSSEC
DRM
DUP/S
EPROM
ESA/SM
EV/SM
EVSE/SM
IB/S
ICA/M
ICAC/S
ICD/SM
IMAP
IoT
IP
IPK/S
IPv4
IPv6
JSON
LDAP
LED/S
MEI/S
MRD/S
NAT/S
NOC/SM
OEM/S
OID/S
ON/S
OTA/S
OTP
PAA/SM
PAI/SM
PCI
PDU/S
PID/S
PIXIT/S
PPPoE
PSK/S
PSKc
RAM
RCAC/S
RDN/S
RFID/S
RGB
RVC/S
SDK/S
SDU/SM
SKU/S
SMTP
SSL
SVE/S
TCP
TE/S
TLS
TU/S
UDP
UI/S
URI/SM
url/S
URL/S
USB
UUID/S
VID/S
W3C
XML/S
